Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1
Short Title, Construction, General Provisions

§ 28-41-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Idaho Credit Code.”

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-101, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-102. Purposes — Rules of construction.

This act shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this act are:

To simplify, clarify and modernize the law governing installment sales, credit, loans and usury;

To further understanding of the terms of credit transactions and to foster competition among suppliers of credit so that debtors may obtain credit at reasonable cost;

To protect debtors against unfair practices by some suppliers of credit, having due regard for the interests of legitimate and scrupulous creditors;

To permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound credit practices; and

To conform the regulation of those credit transactions to the policies of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, where applicable.

A reference to a requirement imposed by this act includes reference to a related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-102, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-103. Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this act, the Uniform Commercial Code and the principles of law and equity, including the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement the provisions of this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-103, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-104. Construction against implicit repeal.

This act being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-104, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-105. Severability.

If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-105, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-106. Waiver — Agreement to forgo rights — Settlement of claims.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, a debtor may not waive or agree to forgo rights or benefits under this act.

A claim by a debtor against a creditor for an excess charge, other violation of this act, or civil penalty, or a claim against a debtor for default or breach of a duty imposed by this act, if disputed in good faith, may be settled by agreement.

A claim, whether or not disputed, against a debtor may be settled for less value than the amount claimed.

A settlement in which the debtor waives or agrees to forgo rights or benefits under this act is invalid if the court, as a matter of law, finds the settlement to have been unconscionable at the time it was made. The competence of the debtor, any deception or coercion practiced upon him, the nature and extent of the legal advice received by him, and the value of the consideration are relevant to the issue of unconscionability.

Title 41, Idaho Code, shall not apply to an agreement by a creditor or lessor, with or without consideration, to forgive or waive all or any part of a debt or lease obligation following a partial or total loss of the property that is the subject of a loan, credit sale or lease transaction and the forgiveness shall not be considered the transaction of insurance for the purposes of the Idaho credit code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-106, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2000, ch. 175, § 1, p. 443; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 15, p. 1008.

§ 28-41-107. Effect of act on powers of organizations.

This act prescribes maximum charges for all creditors, except those excluded under section 28-41-202, Idaho Code, extending credit as a regular business, including regulated credit sales, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, and regulated loans, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, and displaces existing limitations on the powers of those creditors based on maximum charges, except in insurance matters as prescribed by rule of the department of insurance.

With respect to sellers of goods or services, small loan companies, licensed lenders, finance companies, sales finance companies, industrial banks and loan companies, and commercial banks, this act displaces existing limitations on their powers based solely on amount or duration of credit, except the insurance matters as prescribed by rule of the department of insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, this act does not displace limitations on powers of credit unions, savings banks, savings and loan associations, or other thrift institutions whether organized for the profit of shareholders or as mutual organizations.

Except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, this act does not displace:

Limitations on powers of supervised financial organizations, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, with respect to the amount of a loan to a single borrower, the ratio of the loan to the value of collateral, the duration of a loan secured by an interest in land, or other similar restrictions designed to protect deposits; or

Limitations on powers an organization is authorized to exercise under the laws of this state or the United States.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 1, title 57, Idaho Code, and chapter 27, title 67, Idaho Code, any supervised financial organization which intentionally fails to comply with the provisions of this act shall not be entitled to receive deposits from state or public depositing units.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-107, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 9, p. 108.

§ 28-41-108. Transactions subject to act by agreement.

Parties to a credit transaction or modification thereof that is not a regulated consumer credit transaction, as defined in section 28-41-301, Idaho Code, may agree in a writing signed by them that the transaction is subject to the provisions of this act applying to regulated consumer credit transactions. If the parties so agree, the transaction is a regulated consumer credit transaction for the purposes of this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-108, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 10, p. 108.